Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 2
REGISTERED AGENTS, FILING, ANNUAL REPORTS, AND
STATEMENT OF FOREIGN ENTITY AUTHORITY

7-58-201. Limited cooperative associations - registered agents - service of process - annual reports.

Part 7 of article 90 of this title, providing for registered agents and service of process, applies to limited cooperative associations formed under this article.

Part 5 of article 90 of this title, providing for periodic reports, applies to limited cooperative associations formed under this article.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 768, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-202. Foreign entity authority.

Part 8 of article 90 of this title, providing for the transaction of business or the conduct of activities by foreign entities, applies to foreign limited cooperative associations formed under substantially similar laws of another jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 769, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.